Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.065

Stock at large in restricted areas—Running at large on state or federal land.

(1) No person owning or in control of any livestock shall willfully or negligently allow such livestock to run at large in any stock restricted area or to wander or stray upon the right-of-way of any public highway lying within a stock restricted area when not in the charge of some person.

(2) Livestock may run at large upon lands belonging to the state of Washington or the United States only when the owner of the livestock has been granted grazing privileges in writing.

[ 1989 c 286 s 9; 1985 c 415 s 20; 1937 c 40 s 6; RRS s 3070-3. Formerly RCW 16.24.070, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.